Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,105
Confirmation of report of referees; judgment.

Upon report of the referee or referees being confirmed, judgment thereon shall be rendered that the partition be firm and effectual forever.

R.S.1867, Code § 838, p. 541;

R.S.1913, § 8321;

C.S.1922, § 9273;

C.S.1929, § 20-21,105;

R.S.1943, § 25-21,105.

Where summons was properly served in partition suit upon defendants who were claimed to be insane, confirmation of sale was binding, and would not be set aside against bona fide purchaser. Schleuning v. Tatro, 122 Neb. 3, 238 N.W. 741 (1931).